Utah statutes.
78B-1-210.   Privileged communications.

If a hearing-impaired person communicates through an interpreter to any person under such circumstances that the communication would be privileged and the person could not be compelled to testify as to the communications, this privilege shall apply to the interpreter as well.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

